South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3556.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-17-560 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-17-560.  (A) The state executive committee must meet in Columbia at such place as may be designated by the chairman to hear and decide protests and contests that may arise in the case of federal officers, state officers, State Senate, State House of Representatives, and officers involving more than one county, partisan county officers, partisan less than county officers, and partisan municipal officers. Any protest or contest must be filed in writing with the chairman of the committee, together with a copy for each candidate in the race, not later than noon on Monday following the canvassing of the votes for these officers by the committee. However, service upon the chairman may be perfected by depositing at the office of the Chief of the State Law Enforcement Division a copy of the protest, together with a copy for each candidate in the race. The chief must take immediate steps to deliver these copies to the chairman. The protest must contain each ground thereof stated separately and concisely. The chairman of the committee must forthwith serve upon each candidate in the protested race a copy of the protest and serve a notice of the time and place of the meeting of the committee for the purposes of hearing the protest. (B) The state executive committee may, by resolution adopted at least sixty days prior to the conduct of a primary, require the filing of any protest or contest to be accompanied by a refundable deposit for hearing costs, not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars. The amount of the deposit must be refunded to a candidate who files a protest or contest only if: (1) the state executive committee upholds the protest or contest; or (2) a petition to the Supreme Court under Section 7-17-570(D) is granted. bond with surety as payment for the reasonable costs of hearing the protest in the event the election challenge is denied. However, the amount may not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars. If a protestant or contestant's election challenge is granted, he shall receive a refund of the amount of the surety bond. SECTION 2.  Section 7-17-570 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-17-570.  (A) The executive committee shall hear the protest or contest on Thursday following within two weeks of the deadline for filing the same. Testimony at the hearing shall be limited to the grounds stated in the written protest. (B) The protestant and each other candidate in the protested race shall have the right to be present at the hearing, to be represented by counsel, to examine and cross-examine witnesses and to produce evidence relevant to the grounds of the protest. The chairman of the committee shall provide for and conduct the hearing as nearly as possible in accordance with the procedures and rules of evidence observed by the circuit courts of this State. The chairman shall have authority to administer oaths and subpoena witnesses. Upon the conclusion of the hearing of the protest the committee shall determine all issues by majority vote and forthwith certify the results of the election. The State Election Commission shall pay for the costs of the court reporter and the transcript of the hearing. (C) The committee shall remain in session until a conclusion has been reached. All candidates in the protested or contested race shall be immediately notified of the committee's decision. (D) Appeals from decisions by the state executive committee must be taken directly to the Supreme Court on petition for a writ of certiorari based only on the record of the state executive committee hearing. Notice of appeal must be served within ten days of the state executive committee's decision. The Supreme Court may impose filing fees for appeals taken pursuant to this subsection. SECTION 3.  Section 5-15-80 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 5-15-80. The results of any political party primary shall be declared by the party conducting the election. Protests and contests shall be filed, heard, and decided in the manner set forth in Sections 7-17-560 and 7-17-570. writing with the municipal party chairman within two days after the day of the declaration of the results of the election and the municipal party executive committee shall determine such protests within five days after the filing thereof. From the decision of the municipal party committee an appeal may be made to the Board of State Canvassers of Municipal Primaries as provided in Â§ 7-17-580. Notice and grounds of appeal must be filed in writing with the chairman of the Board of State Canvassers of Municipal Primaries within five days following the date on which the decision of the municipal committee is declared. Any appeal thereafter shall be to the court of common pleas of the county in which the municipality is situate. Notice and grounds of appeal shall be served on the opposing parties or their attorneys within ten days following the decision of the Board of State Canvassers of Municipal Primaries. SECTION 4.  Sections 7-17-520, 7-17-530, 7-17-540, 7-17-550, 7-17-580, and 7-17-590 of the S.C. Code are repealed. SECTION 5.  Section 5-15-120 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 5-15-120.  (A) Immediately upon the closing of the polls at any municipal election, the managers shall count publicly the votes cast and make a statement of the whole number of votes cast in such election together with the number of votes cast for each candidate for mayor and councilman and transmit this information to the municipal election commission.  In partisan elections the person securing the highest number of votes for mayor shall be declared elected and the councilmen shall be selected by the following methods: (a)(1) When all councilmen are to be elected at large, the persons receiving the highest number of votes in number equal to the number to be chosen shall be declared elected. (b)(2) When the councilmen are to be elected from each ward and are required to be residents of that ward, the person receiving the highest number of votes in that ward shall be declared elected. (c)(3) When some councilmen are to be elected from each ward and required to be residents of that ward and the remainder of the councilmen to be elected at large, those persons receiving the highest number of votes in each ward shall be declared elected and those persons running at large who receive the highest number of votes in number equal to the number to be chosen at large shall be declared elected. (d)(4) When all councilmen are to be elected at large, but required to reside in a particular ward, the person receiving the highest number of votes for the seat to be filled shall be declared elected. (e)(5) When all councilmen are to be elected at large, but some are required to be residents of particular wards and other councilmen may not be so required, the person receiving the highest number of votes for the seat to be filled shall be declared elected. (B) Newly elected officers shall not be qualified until at least forty-eight hours after the closing of the polls and in the case a contest is finally filed the incumbents shall hold over until the contest is finally determined.A municipal governing body may by ordinance determine when the terms of its newly elected officers begin, provided the terms must begin no earlier than forty-eight hours after the certification of the election results and no later than eighty days after the day of the election. If a municipality does not have an ordinance determining when the terms of its newly elected officers begin, then the terms of the newly elected officers in the municipality begin at the start of the first regular meeting of its council in the month following the election. (C) A candidate who is declared elected by certification of the election results has the right to take the oath of office and to perform the duties of the office pending the outcome of a contest unless a court of competent jurisdiction directs otherwise. SECTION 6.  Section 7-3-25(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) If a county board of voter registration and elections or a municipal election commission does not or cannot determine and certify the results of an election or referendum for which it is responsible by the time set for certification by applicable law, the responsibility to determine and certify the results is devolved upon the State Election Commission. SECTION 7.A.  Chapter 15, Title 5 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 5-15-45. (A) Notwithstanding Section 5-15-40, if the unexpired four-year term of a mayor or member of council began following a general election held: (1) in 2023, then the term expires on the date terms begin for newly elected officers in the municipality following the general election to be held on April 6, 2027, or November 2, 2027, as applicable; (2) in 2024 or 2025, then the term expires on the date terms begin for newly elected officers in the municipality following the general election to be held on April 3, 2029, or November 6, 2029, as applicable; or (3) in 2026, then the term expires on the date terms begin for newly elected officers in the municipality following the general election to be held on April 8, 2031, or November 4, 2031, as applicable. (B) Notwithstanding Section 5-15-40, if the unexpired two-year term of a mayor or member of council began following a general election held: (1) in 2025, then the term expires on the date terms begin for newly elected officers in the municipality following the general election to be held on April 6, 2027, or November 2, 2027, as applicable; or (2) in 2026, then the term expires on the date terms begin for newly elected officers in the municipality following the general election to be held on April 3, 2029, or November 6, 2029, as applicable. (C) The provisions of this section do not apply to a municipality whose general elections are held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April in even-numbered years or the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in even-numbered years, as provided in Section 5-15-50(E). B. This SECTION takes effect on January 1, 2027. SECTION 8.A.  Section 5-15-50 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 5-15-50. (A) Each municipal governing body may by ordinance establish municipal ward lines and the time for general and special elections within the municipality.  Public notice of the elections shall be given at least sixty days prior to such elections. (B) The time for general elections within a municipality must be established in odd-numbered years as follows: (1) on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April; or (2) on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. (C) If the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of odd-numbered years is the time for general elections within a municipality on or after the effective date of this subsection, then the municipal governing body must not establish a different time for its general elections. (D) If within ninety days of the effective date of this subsection a municipal governing body fails to establish by ordinance a time for its general elections as provided in subsection (B), then the time for the general elections within that municipality is the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in odd-numbered years unless subsection (E) applies. (E) Notwithstanding another provision of this section, if the most recent general elections within a municipality preceding the effective date of this subsection were held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April in even-numbered years, or on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in even-numbered years, then the municipality may retain the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April in even-numbered years, or the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in even-numbered years, as applicable, for the date for its general elections. B. This SECTION takes effect on January 1, 2027. SECTION 9.A.  Section 5-15-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 5-15-60. (A) Each municipality in this State shall adopt by ordinance one of the following alternative methods of nominating candidates for and determining the results of its nonpartisan elections: (1) The nonpartisan plurality method prescribed in Â§Section 5-15-61; (2) The nonpartisan election and runoff election method prescribed in Â§Section 5-15-62; (3) The nonpartisan primary election and general election method prescribed in Â§Section 5-15-63. (B)(1) If nonpartisan elections are not provided for, nomination of candidates for municipal offices may be by party primary, party convention or by petition only in municipalities with populations under thirty-nine thousand according to the most recent official United States census. (2) Municipal party primaries, party conventions, and petition nominations must be conducted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the applicable provisions of the state election laws, and the rules of municipal political party organizations not in conflict therewith. B. A municipality with a population over thirty-nine thousand according to the most recent official United States census that provides for the partisan nomination of candidates for municipal offices on the effective date of this SECTION must, by April 1, 2027, adopt by ordinance a method of nominating candidates prescribed in Sections 5-15-61, 5-15-62, or 5-15-63. If the municipality does not adopt a new method by that date, then the method prescribed in Section 5-15-61 is in effect until revised by ordinance. C. This SECTION takes effect on January 1, 2027. SECTION 10. Section 5-15-100 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 5-15-100.  The municipal election commission shall be vested with the functions, powers and duties of Municipal Supervisors of Registration if no such supervisors have been appointed pursuant to Â§ 7-5-640, and shall also have the functions, powers and duties of commissioners of election, as set forth in Â§ 7-5-10 and other provisions of Title 7.  The municipal election commission shall insureensure proper books of registration are provided for each ward or precinct, shall prepare and distribute ballots and election materials, appoint managers of election for each polling place, and otherwise supervise and conduct all municipal, special and general elections.  The managers shall certify the results of the election to the commission within one day and theThe commission shall declare certify the results not later than three days following the election. Nominees in a party primary or party convention and nominees by petition shall be certified to the municipal election commission within the time specified herein and when so certified, the commission shall place the names of such nominees upon the ballots. SECTION 11. Section 5-15-130 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 5-15-130.  (A) Within forty-eight hours after the closing of the polls, anyA candidate may contest the result of the election as reported by the managers by filing a written notice of such contest, together with a concise statement of the grounds therefor, with the Municipal Election Commission not later than noon on the Monday following the certification of the results. If the deadline falls on a legal holiday, then the time for filing extends to noon on the next day that is not a legal holiday.  Within forty-eight hours after the filing of such notice, theThe Municipal Election Commission shall, after due notice to the parties concerned, conduct a hearing on the contest, not later than the Saturday following the deadline for filing the contest. The commission must decide the issues raised, file its report together with all recorded testimony and exhibits with the clerk of court of the county in which the municipality is situated, notify the parties concerned of the decisions made, and when the decision invalidates the election the council shall order a new election as to the parties concerned. (B) Neither the mayor nor any member of council shall be eligible to pass on the issues arising in any contest in which he is a party. SECTION 12. Section 5-15-140 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 5-15-140.  Within ten days after notice of the decision of the municipal election commission, any party aggrieved thereby may appeal from such decision to the court of common pleas.  Notice of appeal shall be served on the opposing parties or their attorneys and filed in the office of the clerk of court within ten days.  The notice of appeal shall act as a stay of further proceedings pending the appeal. SECTION 13.A. Chapter 15, Title 5 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 5-15-175.  (A) Notwithstanding another provision of this chapter, a municipal election commission may only be established for municipalities with a population of ten thousand or more, according to the most recent official United States census. (B) Elections for municipalities with a population of less than ten thousand, according to the most recent official United States census, must be conducted and certified by the county boards of voter registration and elections. (1) If a municipality is located within only one county, its municipal elections must be conducted and certified by the county board of voter registration and elections of the county in which the municipality is located. (2) If a municipality is located within more than one county: (a) its municipal elections must be conducted jointly by each county board of voter registration and elections containing a portion of registered electors in the municipality; and (b) its municipal elections must be certified by the county board of voter registration and elections of the county in which its main office is located. (C) A municipality whose elections are conducted and certified pursuant to this section must reimburse a county board of voter registration and elections for the reasonable costs incurred in conducting and certifying its elections in accordance with a reimbursement schedule provided by the State Election Commission. B. On the effective date of this SECTION, municipal election commissions for municipalities under ten thousand, according to the most recent official United States census, are abolished. Their duties, responsibilities, and functions are devolved upon the county boards of voter registration and elections. C. This SECTION takes effect on January 1, 2027. SECTION 14. Except as otherwise provided in this act, this act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----